Idaho, session 2025, H0050.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 67-5710A, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
67-5710A. REQUIREMENT OF PLANS AND SPECIFICATION APPROVAL BY PERMA-
NENT BUILDING FUND ADVISORY COUNCIL AND DELEGATION OF PROJECT OVERSIGHT BY
THE ADMINISTRATOR FOR THE DIVISION OF PUBLIC WORKS.
(1)(a) Except as set forth in this section, an existing public works
may not be altered, repaired, constructed or improved on property owned
or occupied by any state institution, department, commission, board or
agency, if the estimated cost of work exceeds the limit established in
section 67-5711, Idaho Code, without regard to source of funding, until
the location, design, plans and specifications are approved by the per-
manent building fund advisory council and the project supervised by the
division of public works or its designee.
(b) Facilities to be built with funds under the control of a nonstate
entity, and owned or occupied by state entities, must have plans and
specifications prepared, and all plans and specifications must be re-
viewed and approved by the permanent building fund advisory council
prior to the advertising, bidding, construction and/or negotiation for
construction of the facilities.
(c) Plans and specifications submitted for approval shall comply with
public works statutes, life safety and building codes, and other appli-
cable codes and regulations. The plans and specifications must also
comply with any guidelines or procedures for design and construction
adopted by the division of public works and approved by the permanent
building fund advisory council.
(d) The following are exempt from the requirement of prior approval of
location, design, plans, and specifications in this section:
(i) Emergency public works contracts issued pursuant to section
67-5711B, Idaho Code; and
(ii) Institutions and agencies exempt from the authority of the
department of administration pursuant to section 67-5711, Idaho
Code.
(2) The administrator for the division of public works may delegate
control over design, construction, and all other aspects of a public works
or maintenance project that costs less than three hundred thousand dollars
($300,000) five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) to agencies of state
government on a project-by-project basis, if a responsible party of the


state agency requests that delegation in writing and the permanent building
fund advisory council approves the delegation.
(a) The state agency to whom control is delegated shall assume all re-
sponsibility for project budgets and shall receive funds appropriated
for the project upon application and approval by the permanent building
fund advisory council.
(b) Delegation of project control does not exempt the state agency from
complying with public works statutes, life safety and building codes
or other applicable codes and regulations. The state agency also must
comply with any guidelines or procedures for design and construction
adopted by the division of public works and the permanent building fund
advisory council.
(c) State agencies that receive delegated projects may not have access
to permanent building fund advisory council contingency funds unless
approved by the permanent building fund advisory council or authorized
by appropriation.
(d) Prior written approval from the administrator must be granted
for any public works utilizing sole source or limited competition. No
agency will be delegated the ability to declare an emergency as defined
in section 67-5711B, Idaho Code.
(e) The permanent building fund advisory council may elect to audit any
project for compliance with applicable codes and policies.
(f) The delegated state agency will use standard documents for profes-
sional services contracts and for construction contracts as adopted by
the division of public works.
(g) Delegation is subject to cancellation by the administrator for the
division of public works with the concurrence of the permanent building
fund advisory council.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.